Missouri, session 2026, HB2826.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 285, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 285.460, to read as follows:
285.460. Any private employer that provides paid family and medical leave to its
2 employees shall provide such leave to its employees for adoptions and fostering,
3 including leave for the adopted or foster child's birth, placement, and bonding after
4 placement of the child, under the same terms and conditions and in equal or equivalent
5 coverage as other covered paid leave under the employer's policy for maternal, paternal,
6 or other family leave available to its employees.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.